District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Defective Deed Recordation Clarification Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. An Act To establish a code of law for the District of Columbia, approved March
3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1189, Chapter 854; D.C. Official Code § 42-401 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 499a (D.C. Official Code § 42-402) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) An instrument recorded in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds shall be effective
notwithstanding the existence of 1 or more of the failures in the formal requisites listed in
Section 499c, unless the failure is challenged in a judicial proceeding commenced within 6
months after the instrument is recorded; provided, that an instrument recorded before the
effective date of this act may be challenged in a judicial proceeding commenced within 6 months
from the effective date of this act.

“(b) Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of instruments recorded before the
effective date of this act, which have been validated by prior law.”.
(b) Section 499b (D.C. Official Code § 42-403) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.